Nebraska, session 109, LB1.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 2, Initiative Law 2024, No. 437, is amended to read:
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection
Act:
(1)(a) Allowable amount of cannabis means up to five ounces of cannabis.
(b) Allowable amount of cannabis does not include the weight of any other
ingredient combined with cannabis as part of topical or oral administrations,
food, drink, or other preparations;
(2)(a) Cannabis means all parts of the plant of the genus cannabis whether
growing or not, the seeds thereof, the resin extracted from any part of the
plant, and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of the plant, its seeds, or its resin.
(b) Cannabis includes marijuana, hashish, and concentrated cannabis.
(c) Cannabis does not include hemp, as defined in section 2-503 Section
2-503(13) of the Nebraska Hemp Farming Act, nor does it include the mature
stalks of the plant, fiber produced from such stalks, oil or cake made from the
seeds of the plant, the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of
germination, or cannabidiol contained in a drug product approved by the federal
Food and Drug Administration;
(3) Cannabis accessories means any equipment, products, or materials of
any kind that are used, intended for use, or designed for use in storing,
vaporizing, or containing cannabis, or for ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise
introducing cannabis into the human body;
(4) Caregiver means:
(a) In the case of a qualified patient who is eighteen years of age or
older and is not under the protection of a legal guardian, a person who:
(i) Is at least twenty-one years of age; and
(ii) Has been designated by a qualified patient in a signed affidavit;
(b) In the case of a qualified patient who is younger than eighteen years
of age or a qualified patient under the protection of a legal guardian:
(i) The legal guardian or parent with authority to make health care
decisions of the qualified patient; or
(ii) A person designated in a sworn affidavit by the legal guardian or
parent with authority to make health care decisions; or
(c) A health care facility as defined in section 71-413 or a home health
agency as defined in section 71-417, if the facility or agency has been
designated by a qualified patient or the legal guardian or parent with
authority to make health care decisions of a qualified patient in a sworn
affidavit and if the facility or agency has agreed in writing to serve as a
caregiver for the qualified patient;
(5) Health care practitioner means a physician, an osteopathic physician,
a physician assistant, or a nurse practitioner licensed under the Uniform
Credentialing Act or who is licensed in any state and practicing in compliance
with the Uniform Credentialing Act;
(6) Qualified patient means:
(a) An individual eighteen years of age or older with a written
recommendation from a health care practitioner; or
(b) An individual younger than eighteen years of age with a written
recommendation from a health care practitioner and with the written permission
of a legal guardian or parent with authority to make health care decisions for
the individual; and
(7) Written recommendation means a valid signed and dated declaration from
a health care practitioner stating that, in the health care practitioner's
professional judgment, the potential benefits of cannabis outweigh the
potential harms for the alleviation of a patient's medical condition, its
symptoms, or side effects of the condition's treatment. A written
recommendation is valid for two years after the date of issuance or for a
period of time specified by the health care practitioner on the written
recommendation.
Sec. 2. Section 2, Initiative Law 2024, No. 438, is amended to read:
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act:
(1)(a) Cannabis means all parts of the plant of the genus cannabis whether
growing or not, the seeds thereof, the resin extracted from any part of the
plant, and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of the plant, its seeds, or its resin.
(b) Cannabis includes marijuana, hashish, and concentrated cannabis.
(c) Cannabis does not include hemp, as defined in section 2-503 Section
-1-

LB1 LB1
2025 2025
2-503(13) of the Nebraska Hemp Farming Act, nor does it include the mature
stalks of the plant, fiber produced from such stalks, oil or cake made from the
seeds of the plant, the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of
germination, or cannabidiol contained in a drug product approved by the federal
Food and Drug Administration;
(2) Cannabis accessories means any equipment, products, or materials of
any kind that are used, intended for use, or designed for use in planting,
propagating, cultivating, growing, harvesting, composting, manufacturing,
compounding, converting, producing, processing, preparing, testing, analyzing,
packaging, repackaging, storing, vaporizing, or containing cannabis, or for
ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing cannabis into the human body;
(3) Cannabis for medical purposes means cannabis, cannabis products, and
cannabis accessories intended for qualified patients pursuant to any law
enacted contemporaneously with the adoption of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act or at any time thereafter and which makes penalties inapplicable
to the use of cannabis by qualified patients for the alleviation of a medical
condition, its symptoms, or side effects of the condition's treatment;
(4) Cannabis products means products that are comprised of cannabis,
cannabis concentrate, or cannabis extract, and other ingredients, and that are
intended for use or consumption, such as, but not limited to, edible products,
ointments, and tinctures;
(5) Commission means the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission;
(6) Registered cannabis establishment means a private entity registered
pursuant to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act that possesses,
manufactures, distributes, delivers, or dispenses cannabis for medical
purposes; and
(7) Registration means a registration granted by the commission to a
private entity that processes, manufactures, distributes, delivers, or
dispenses cannabis for medical purposes.
Sec. 3. Original section 2, Initiative Law 2024, No. 437, and section 2,
Initiative Law 2024, No. 438, are repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-2-